Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 1521.
Purpose.

It is the policy of the State of Vermont that all Vermonters should receive educational services that enable them to master the skills essential for further education and training or for successful entry into or advancement in the workplace.

It is further the policy of the State of Vermont that Vermont’s career technical education system shall be based on clear standards for student performance and career technical education program performance and that achievement of these standards shall be measured on a regular and ongoing basis.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1997, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. April 27, 1998.

§ 1522.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Secondary CTE student” means a resident of this State, of any age, who has not completed high school and is enrolled in a secondary career technical education program.

“Adult student” means a resident of this State, of any age, who has completed high school and who needs additional career technical education for entry into the labor force or who needs to upgrade skills to qualify for higher pay or for more dependable employment.

“Secondary career technical education” or “secondary CTE” means an educational program leading to a high school diploma, designed to provide students with career and technical knowledge, skills, and attitudes that will prepare them for further education, enhance their employment options, or lead to an industry-recognized credential.

“Regional CTE center” means any of the 16 regional CTE centers operating with State support on January 1, 1984 and any other centers so designated thereafter by rule of the State Board.

“Sending district” means a school district paying tuition on behalf of a student to a school district that provides CTE courses.

“Receiving district” means a school district, inside or outside of this State, receiving tuition on behalf of a student to whom it provides career technical education. The classification of a school district as a receiving district is not altered by reason of the participation of that district in a contract for management of the regional CTE center under section 1543 of this title.

“Service region” means, for each regional CTE center, a region surrounding it designated by rule of the State Board under section 1531 of this title. The State Board may designate a service region for two or more comprehensive high schools if that region is not served by a career technical center.

, (9)[Repealed.]

(10)

“CTE tuition” means the amount calculated by subtracting from total regional technical CTE center costs all expenditures from State and federal grants except for incentive grants, adult education grants, or other State grants as defined by State Board rule, then dividing the result by the sum of the actual number of full-time equivalent out-of-state students and the average of the full-time equivalent Vermont students for the three prior years.

(11)

“Adult career technical education” or “adult CTE” means an educational program that is not part of a postsecondary degree program, that does not award postsecondary credit, and that provides students with career and technical knowledge, skills, and attitudes that will prepare them for further education, enhance their employment options, or lead to an industry-recognized credential.

(12)

“Postsecondary career technical education” or “postsecondary CTE” means an educational program or course of study that awards postsecondary credit and is designed to provide students with career and technical knowledge, skills, and attitudes that will prepare them for further education, enhance their employment options, or lead to an industry-recognized credential.

(13)

“Postsecondary CTE student” means a resident of this State, of any age, who desires to enroll in, or is enrolled in, a postsecondary CTE program.

(14)

“Comprehensive high school” means a public or independent school other than a career technical center that provides secondary career technical education approved under section 1533 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1987, No. 238

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 49a, 49b, eff. June 21, 1994;

1997, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. July 1, 1999;

2001, No. 63

, § 164d, eff. July 1, 2002;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 140, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.